Hawaii statutes.
§353E-2 Interagency coordination. (a) To carry out their responsibilities under section
353E-1, the department of public
safety, Hawaii paroling authority, judiciary, department of health, department
of human services, and any other agency assigned sex offender oversight
responsibilities by law or administrative order, shall establish, by an
interagency cooperative agreement, a coordinating body, to be known as the sex
offender management team, to oversee the development and implementation of sex
offender assessment, evaluation, treatment, and supervision services and
programs in the State consistent with section 353E-1(1). The interagency
cooperative agreement shall set forth the role of the sex offender management
team and the responsibilities of each agency that is a party to the agreement.

(b) The department of public safety shall be the lead
agency for the statewide integrated sex offender treatment program. As the
lead agency, the department shall act as facilitator of the sex offender
management team by providing administrative support to the sex offender
management team.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary,
for purposes of sex offender treatment and community supervision, any agency
that is part of the interagency cooperative agreement shall provide, upon the
request of any other participating agency, all relevant criminal, parole,
medical, psychological, or mental health records of any offender receiving
supervision or treatment while under custody of the State. Records received by
a participating agency under this section shall be confidential and shall be
disclosed by the receiving agency only for the purposes and under the
circumstances expressly authorized by this section. Any agency providing
records under this section shall document the disclosures made under this
section, including the name of the agency to which the record is disclosed, the
title of the record disclosed, and the date of disclosure.

(d) The sex offender management team may hold meetings
closed to the public pursuant to section 92-4 for the purpose of discussing
information relating to individual sex offenders where disclosure of the
information would be a clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy.
[L 1992, c 164, pt of §2; am L 1999, c 95, §2; am L 2016, c 36, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next